Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3807
Costs; written protest; hearing;
county board; power.

If
any person is dissatisfied with the amount of any costs charged against him
or her under the Black-Tailed Prairie Dog Management Act, he or she may, within
fifteen days after being advised of the amount of the charge, file a written
protest with the county board. The county board shall hold a hearing to determine
whether the charges were appropriate, taking into consideration whether the
management measures were conducted in a timely fashion. Following the hearing,
the county board shall have the power to adjust or affirm such charge.

Laws 2012, LB473, § 7.